Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3169.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin FLOOD HAZARD MITIGATION; REDPATH IMPOUNDMENT.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin (a) $13,700,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the commissioner of natural resources for the state share of flood hazard mitigation grants for publicly owned capital improvements to prevent or alleviate flood damage under Minnesota Statutes, section 103F.161. new text end new text begin (b) Levee projects, to the extent practical, shall meet the state standard of three feet above the 100-year flood elevation. new text end new text begin (c) Project priorities shall be determined by the commissioner as appropriate and based on need. new text end new text begin (d) This appropriation is for the Redpath impoundment project sponsored by the Bois de Sioux Watershed District. new text end new text begin (e) For any project listed in this subdivision that the commissioner determines is not ready to proceed or does not expend all the money allocated to it, the commissioner may allocate that project's money to a project on the commissioner's priority list. new text end new text begin (f) To the extent that the cost of a project exceeds two percent of the median household income in a municipality or township multiplied by the number of households in the municipality or township, this appropriation is also for the local share of the project. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $13,700,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end